Missouri, session 2026, HCR40.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, Article IX, Section 1 of the Missouri Constitution guarantees public
education and places responsibility with the General Assembly; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education serves as the
state's public education agency, ensuring high-quality learning from early childhood through
high school, preparing students for college and careers, and supporting educators; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education's core roles
include, but are not limited to, setting standards, accrediting districts, managing state and
federal funds, overseeing teacher certification, providing support services for diverse learners,
and administering programs for children with disabilities and early childhood; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education's role has
increasingly grown beyond counting students, managing funds, and reporting outcomes. Too
many other programs have been added to the Department's responsibilities, which has
weakened the mission of elementary and secondary education; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education's growth has
not translated into better academic outcomes or safer schools; instead, the growth has diluted
the Department's accountability; and


HCR 40 2
WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education has become
increasingly bureaucratic, program driven, and compliance focused; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education is substituting
paperwork and ideology for measurable student success; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education should exist to
provide and administer public education; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education should not
exist to:

(1) Govern classrooms;
(2) Advance social or political agendas not authorized by law;
(3) Create new programs without clear legislative guardrails and accountability; and
(4) Drown schools in compliance paperwork that pulls resources away from students;
and

WHEREAS, the role of the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
needs to be limited in order to return its functions to its proper constitutional role:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby recognize that the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education's role should be narrowed and the Department's effectiveness should be
strengthened by clearly defining what the Department should and should not do; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the General Assembly requests that the
Governor clarify the duties of the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education and
authorize the Commissioner of the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education and
the State Board of Education to do only the following:

(1) Require the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education to act only as
provided by the Missouri Constitution;

(2) Generate a public education scorecard providing clear, simple, transparent data
on student counts, graduation rates, academic outcomes, and legally required reports;

HCR 40 3

(3) Operate a lean accreditation system focused on outcomes and academic growth,
not politics or pedagogy;

(4) Efficiently move dollars from those appropriated by the General Assembly based
on a clearly defined formula to best impact the academic success of students. In order to
prevent fraud and waste, annual performance audits shall be conducted, and such audits shall
be clear and concise as to every dollar spent, including where dollars sent to a local
educational agency are distributed and the correlation with academic success for each local
educational agency; and

(5) Offer support when schools and parents ask for support; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔